incubator/apertium-sjo/apertium-sjo.sjo.twol
Alphabet

 ᠠ ᠪ ᠨ ᡣ ᡬ ᡭ ᠸ ᡫ ᠶ ᡪ ᠯ ᠮ ᡠ ᡡ ᠣ ᡝ ᡞ ᡟ ᡠ ᡡ ᡢ ᡣ ᡤ ᡥ ᡦ ᡧ ᡨ ᡩ ᡪ ᡫ ᡬ ᡭ ᡮ ᡯ ᡰ ᡱ ᡲ ᡳ ᡴ ᡵ ᡶ ᡷ 

%{H%}:ᡥ %{H%}:ᡣ
%{A%}:ᠠ %{A%}:ᡝ %{A%}:ᠪ

  %>:0 ;

Sets 

Boundary = %> ;

FrontVow = ᡞ ;

Rules 

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ; 

!"Vowel harmony"
!%{A%}:ᡝ <=> :FrontVow :* _ ;
